Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4076.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 44, chapter 10, article 7, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 44-1535, to read: START_STATUTE44-1535. Warranty of purchased goods; return policy; merchant prohibitions; contracts A. A merchant that sells a good in this state shall replace the good if the person who purchased the good provides notice to the merchant not later than seventy-two hours after the delivery of that good that the good does not function in its ordinary or intended use. B. At the person's option, the merchant shall do either of the following: 1. Replace the good with a new, identical or substantially similar good that is in working condition. 2. Accept the return of the good and provide a full refund of the purchase price, including any taxes, fees and delivery charges that were paid by the person. C. A merchant may not: 1. Require that the customer allow the good to be repaired before receiving a replacement good or a refund within the seventy-two-hour period. 2. Attempt to waive, disclaim or limit the rights provided in this section as void and unenforceable within the seventy-two-hour period, even if the merchant includes language indicating that the good is "as-is", a "final sale" or a "no return". D. This section applies to goods that are sold by merchants in this state and does not limit any other remedies that are available under state or federal law.END_STATUTE